Nebraska, session 109, LB744.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB744 LB744
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 48-101.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
48-101.01 (1) The Legislature finds and declares:
(a) The occupations of first responders are recognized as stressful
occupations. Only our nation's combat soldiers endure more stress.
Similar to military personnel, first responders face unique and uniquely
dangerous risks in their sworn mission to keep the public safe. They rely
on each other for survival to protect the communities they serve;
(b) On any given day, first responders can be called on to make life
and death decisions, witness a young child dying with the child's grief-
stricken family, make a decision that will affect a community member for
the rest of such person's life, or be exposed to a myriad of communicable
diseases and known carcinogens;
(c) On any given day, first responders protect high-risk individuals
from themselves and protect the community from such individuals;
(d) First responders are constantly at significant risk of bodily
harm or physical assault while they perform their duties;
(e) Constant, cumulative exposure to horrific events make first
responders uniquely susceptible to the emotional and behavioral impacts
of job-related stressors;
(f) Trauma-related injuries can become overwhelming and manifest in
post-traumatic stress, which may result in substance use disorders and
even, tragically, suicide; and
(g) It is imperative for society to recognize occupational injuries
related to post-traumatic stress and to promptly seek diagnosis and
treatment without stigma. This includes recognizing that mental injury
and mental illness as a result of trauma is not disordered, but is a
normal and natural human response to trauma, the negative effects of
which can be ameliorated through diagnosis and effective treatment.
(2) Personal injury includes mental injuries and mental illness
unaccompanied by physical injury for an employee who is a first
-2-

LB744 LB744
2026 2026
responder, frontline state employee, or county correctional officer if
such employee:
(a) Establishes that the employee's employment conditions causing
the mental injury or mental illness were extraordinary and unusual in
comparison to the normal conditions of the particular employment; and
(b) Establishes, through a mental health professional, the medical
causation between the mental injury or mental illness and the employment
conditions by medical evidence.
(3) The employee bears the burden of establishing the matters
described in subsection (2) of this section by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(4) Until January 1, 2028, a first responder may establish prima
facie evidence of a personal injury that is a mental injury or mental
illness if the first responder:
(a) Presents evidence that the first responder underwent a mental
health examination by a mental health professional upon entry into such
service or subsequent to such entry and before the onset of the mental
injury or mental illness and such examination did not reveal the mental
injury or mental illness for which the first responder seeks
compensation;
(b) Presents testimony or an affidavit from a mental health
professional stating the first responder suffers from a mental injury or
mental illness caused by one or more events or series of events which
cumulatively produced the mental injury or mental illness which brought
about the need for medical attention and the interruption of employment;
(c) Presents evidence that such events or series of events arose out
of and in the course of the first responder's employment; and
(d) Presents evidence that, prior to the employment conditions which
caused the mental injury or mental illness, the first responder had
participated in resilience training and updated the training at least
annually thereafter.
-3-

LB744 LB744
2026 2026
(5) For purposes of this section, mental injuries and mental illness
arising out of and in the course of employment unaccompanied by physical
injury are not considered compensable if they result from any event or
series of events which are incidental to normal employer and employee
relations, including, but not limited to, personnel actions by the
employer such as disciplinary actions, work evaluations, transfers,
promotions, demotions, salary reviews, or terminations.
(6)(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide
reimbursement for the cost of any of the following to the extent not
reimbursed by the first responder's employer: A mental health examination
by a mental health professional upon entry into such service or
subsequent to such entry and before the onset of a mental injury or
mental illness for which compensation is sought; initial resilience
training; and annual resilience training. The department shall pay
reimbursement at a rate determined by the Critical Incident Stress
Management Program under section 71-7104. Reimbursement for resilience
training shall be subject to the annual limit set by such program under
section 71-7104.
(b) To obtain reimbursement under this subsection, a first responder
shall submit an application to the Department of Health and Human
Services on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department.
(7) The Department of Health and Human Services shall maintain and
annually update records of first responders who have completed annual
resilience training.
(8) For purposes of this section:
(a) County correctional officer means a correctional officer
employed by a high-population county whose:
(i) Position obligates such employee to maintain order and custody
of inmates in a county jail; and
(ii) Duties involve regular and direct interaction with high-risk
individuals;
-4-

LB744 LB744
2026 2026
(b) Custody means:
(i) Under the charge or control of a state institution or state
agency and includes time spent outside of the state institution or state
agency; or
(ii) In the custody of a county jail in a high-population county or
in the process of being placed in the custody of a county jail in a high-
population county;
(c) First responder means a sheriff, a deputy sheriff, a police
officer, an officer of the Nebraska State Patrol, a volunteer or paid
firefighter, public safety communications personnel, or a volunteer or
paid individual licensed under a licensure classification in subdivision
(1) of section 38-1217 who provides medical care in order to prevent loss
of life or aggravation of physiological or psychological illness or
injury;
(d) Frontline state employee means an employee of the Department of
Correctional Services or the Department of Health and Human Services
whose duties involve regular and direct interaction with high-risk
individuals;
(e) High-population county means a county with more than three
hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United
States Bureau of the Census;
(f) High-risk individual means an individual in custody for whom
violent or physically intimidating behavior is common, including, but not
limited to, a committed offender as defined in section 83-170, a patient
at a regional center as defined in section 71-911, a juvenile committed
to a youth rehabilitation and treatment center, and a person in the
custody of a county jail in a high-population county or in the process of
being placed in the custody of a county jail in a high-population county;
(g) Mental health professional means:
(i) A practicing physician licensed to practice medicine in this
-5-

LB744 LB744
2026 2026
state under the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act;
(ii) A practicing psychologist licensed to engage in the practice of
psychology in this state as provided in section 38-3111 or as provided in
similar provisions of the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact;
(iii) A person licensed as an independent mental health practitioner
under the Mental Health Practice Act; or
(iv) A professional counselor who holds a privilege to practice in
Nebraska as a professional counselor under the Licensed Professional
Counselors Interstate Compact; and
(h) Public safety communications personnel means:
(i) A 911 operator;
(ii) An emergency dispatcher; or
(iii) An employee of an entity that employs 911 operators or
emergency dispatchers; and
(i) (h) Resilience training means training that meets the guidelines
established by the Critical Incident Stress Management Program under
section 71-7104 and that teaches how to adapt to, manage, and recover
from adversity, trauma, tragedy, threats, or significant sources of
stress.
(9) All other provisions of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act
apply to this section.
Sec. 2. Section 71-7113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-7113 (1) All services available and provided to emergency service
personnel under the Critical Incident Stress Management Act shall also be
available and provided to state correctional employees and to public
safety communications personnel for incidents which occur in the course
of their duties or at their worksite.
(2) For purposes of this section, public safety communications
personnel has the same meaning as in section 48-101.01.
Sec. 3. Original section 71-7113, Reissue Revised Statutes of
-6-

LB744 LB744
2026 2026
Nebraska, and section 48-101.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-7-